Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-6] Joinder of parties. (a) Two
or more persons may join in one action under this chapter as plaintiffs if
their respective actions have at least one place of illegal drug activity in
common, and if each plaintiff's illegal drug user's period of illegal drug use
overlaps in time with each other.

(b) Two or more persons may be joined in one
action under this chapter as defendants if those persons are liable to at least
one plaintiff.

(c) A plaintiff need not be interested in
obtaining and a defendant need not be interested in defending against all the
relief demanded. Judgment may be given for one or more plaintiffs according to
their respective rights to relief and against one or more defendants according
to their respective liabilities. [L 2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next